Utah statutes.
32B-5-206.   Seasonal retail license.

(1)  If authorized in the relevant part under Chapter 6, Specific Retail License Act, for the type of retail license, the commission may in accordance with this section issue a seasonal retail license located in an area the commission considers proper.

(2) (a)  A seasonal retail license shall be for a period of six consecutive months.

(b)  A seasonal retail license issued for operation during a summer time period is known as a "Seasonal A" retail license.  The period of operation for a Seasonal A retail license:

(i)  begins on May 1; and

(ii)  ends on October 31.

(c)  A seasonal retail license issued for operation during a winter time period is known as a "Seasonal B" retail license.  The period of operation for a Seasonal B retail license:

(i)  begins on November 1; and

(ii)  ends on April 30.

(3)  In determining the number of each type of retail license that the commission may issue under the relevant part under Chapter 6, Specific Retail License Act:

(a)  a seasonal retail license is counted as one-half of one retail license of the specific type of retail license; and

(b)  each Seasonal A retail license shall be paired with a Seasonal B retail license of the same type of retail license.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

